Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB635.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 42 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Agency" means any state or local governmental department, cabinet,
institution, board, commission, office, or any other unit of government; and
(b) "Grant":
1. Means money, equipment, material, or services that may be available
to an individual or entity from any agency through an application
process administered by the agency; and
2. Does not include contracts for goods or services an agency obtains
through the Kentucky Model Procurement Code, KRS Chapter 45A.
(2) The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall establish a grant database that
shall serve as a single, unified entry point for individuals and entities to access
and review agency grant opportunities. The database shall:
(a) Include the ability to use keyword searches to discover all available grant
opportunities; and
(b) Provide in the information section of the related grant all information
reported by agencies as required under subsection (4) of this section.
(3) The primary goals of the grant database include:
(a) Ensuring state and local grants are easily accessible for individuals and
entities of the Commonwealth; and
(b) Clearly stating requirements for grants to ensure submissions are qualified
for the potential grant.
(4) Beginning December 1, 2025, all agencies shall report quarterly to the Finance
and Administration Cabinet the grant opportunities that are currently available
Page 1 of 2
BR187100.100 - 1871 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1871
from their agency. The report shall include:
(a) The title of the grant;
(b) The statute or administrative regulation that authorizes the grant;
(c) The posting date of the grant;
(d) The deadline for applying for the grant;
(e) The eligibility criteria for the grant;
(f) The total funds available, including the maximum and minimum amounts a
grant recipient could receive;
(g) The grantor's contact information; and
(h) Any other information that may assist in the identification and orderly
allocation of grant funds.
(5) Each county and area development district shall display a link to the grant
database prominently on the homepage or first page of its website.
Page 2 of 2
BR187100.100 - 1871 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:04 PM Jacketed